dictionaries/isv_latcyr_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX MC Y 10
SFX MC 0 0/xPxE .
SFX MC и е/xPxBxO .
SFX MC и е/xPxE .
SFX MC и у/xPxE .
SFX MC и 0 .
SFX MC и ах/xPxE .
SFX MC и ам/xPxE .
SFX MC и еју/xPxE .
SFX MC и ами/xPxE .
SFX MC и о/xPxE .

SFX MD Y 80
SFX MD ти л .
SFX MD ти ла .
SFX MD ти ло .
SFX MD ти ли .
SFX MD скывати шчу .
SFX MD скывати шчем .
SFX MD скывати шчеш .
SFX MD скывати шче .
SFX MD скывати шчемо .
SFX MD скывати шчете .
SFX MD скывати шчут .
SFX MD ти х .
SFX MD ти ше .
SFX MD ти хмо .
SFX MD ти сте .
SFX MD ти ху .
SFX MD скывати шчи .
SFX MD скывати шчимо .
SFX MD скывати шчите .
SFX MD скывати шчучи .
SFX MD скывати шчучего .
SFX MD скывати шчучему .
SFX MD скывати шчучим .
SFX MD скывати шчучем .
SFX MD скывати шчучих .
SFX MD скывати шчучими .
SFX MD скывати шчуча .
SFX MD скывати шчучу .
SFX MD скывати шчучеј .
SFX MD скывати шчучеју .
SFX MD скывати шчуче .
SFX MD скывати шчемы .
SFX MD скывати шчемого .
SFX MD скывати шчемому .
SFX MD скывати шчемым .
SFX MD скывати шчемом .
SFX MD скывати шчемо .
SFX MD скывати шчема .
SFX MD скывати шчему .
SFX MD скывати шчемој .
SFX MD скывати шчемоју .
SFX MD скывати шчеми .
SFX MD скывати шчеме .
SFX MD скывати шчемых .
SFX MD скывати шчемым .
SFX MD скывати шчемыми .
SFX MD ти вши .
SFX MD ти вшего .
SFX MD ти вшему .
SFX MD ти вшим .
SFX MD ти вшем .
SFX MD ти вших .
SFX MD ти вшими .
SFX MD ти вша .
SFX MD ти вшу .
SFX MD ти вшеј .
SFX MD ти вшеју .
SFX MD ти вше .
SFX MD ти ны .
SFX MD ти ного .
SFX MD ти ному .
SFX MD ти ным .
SFX MD ти ном .
SFX MD ти ни .
SFX MD ти не .
SFX MD ти ных .
SFX MD ти ными .
SFX MD ти на .
SFX MD ти ну .
SFX MD ти ној .
SFX MD ти ноју .
SFX MD ти но .
SFX MD ти нје/xPxE .
SFX MD ти нја/xPxE .
SFX MD ти нју/xPxE .
SFX MD ти нјем/xPxE .
SFX MD ти ниј/xPxE .
SFX MD ти нјам/xPxE .
SFX MD ти нјами/xPxE .
SFX MD ти нјах/xPxE .

SFX ME Y 28
SFX ME 0 0/xPxE .
SFX ME ы о/xBxPxE .
SFX ME ы а/xPxE .
SFX ME ы ого/xPxE .
SFX ME ы у/xPxE .
SFX ME ы ој/xPxE .
SFX ME ы ом/xPxE .
SFX ME ы ому/xPxE .
SFX ME 0 м/xPxE .
SFX ME ы оју/xPxE .
SFX ME ы и/xPxE .
SFX ME ы е/xPxE .
SFX ME 0 х/xPxE .
SFX ME 0 ми/xPxE .
SFX ME окы ши/zx .
SFX ME окы шего/zx .
SFX ME окы шему/zx .
SFX ME окы шим/zx .
SFX ME окы шем/zx .
SFX ME окы ше/zx .
SFX ME окы ша/zx .
SFX ME окы шу/zx .
SFX ME окы шеј/zx .
SFX ME окы шеју/zx .
SFX ME окы ших/zx .
SFX ME окы шим/zx .
SFX ME окы шими/zx .
SFX ME стокы шче/xPxE .

SFX MF Y 63
SFX MF ти л .
SFX MF ти ла .
SFX MF ти ло .
SFX MF ти ли .
SFX MF нути у .
SFX MF нути ем .
SFX MF нути еш .
SFX MF нути е .
SFX MF нути емо .
SFX MF нути ете .
SFX MF нути ут .
SFX MF ти х .
SFX MF ти ше .
SFX MF ти хмо .
SFX MF ти сте .
SFX MF ти ху .
SFX MF нути и .
SFX MF нути имо .
SFX MF нути ите .
SFX MF нути учи .
SFX MF нути учего .
SFX MF нути учему .
SFX MF нути учим .
SFX MF нути учем .
SFX MF нути учих .
SFX MF нути учими .
SFX MF нути уча .
SFX MF нути учу .
SFX MF нути учеј .
SFX MF нути учеју .
SFX MF нути уче .
SFX MF нути омы .
SFX MF нути омого .
SFX MF нути омому .
SFX MF нути омым .
SFX MF нути омом .
SFX MF нути омо .
SFX MF нути ома .
SFX MF нути ому .
SFX MF нути омој .
SFX MF нути омоју .
SFX MF нути оми .
SFX MF нути оме .
SFX MF нути омых .
SFX MF нути омым .
SFX MF нути омыми .
SFX MF нути омо .
SFX MF ти вши .
SFX MF ти вшего .
SFX MF ти вшему .
SFX MF ти вшим .
SFX MF ти вшем .
SFX MF ти вших .
SFX MF ти вшими .
SFX MF ти вша .
SFX MF ти вшу .
SFX MF ти вшеј .
SFX MF ти вшеју .
SFX MF ти вше .
SFX MF и ы .
SFX MF и а .
SFX MF и о .
SFX MF и је .

SFX MG Y 10
SFX MG 0 0/xPxE .
SFX MG и о/xPxBxO .
SFX MG и е/xPxE .
SFX MG и у/xPxE .
SFX MG и 0 .
SFX MG и ах/xPxE .
SFX MG и ам/xPxE .
SFX MG и еју/xPxE .
SFX MG и ами/xPxE .
SFX MG и о/xPxE .

SFX MH Y 80
SFX MH ти л .
SFX MH ти ла .
SFX MH ти ло .
SFX MH ти ли .
SFX MH скакати у .
SFX MH скакати ем .
SFX MH скакати еш .
SFX MH скакати е .
SFX MH скакати емо .
SFX MH скакати ете .
SFX MH скакати ут .
SFX MH ти х .
SFX MH ти ше .
SFX MH ти хмо .
SFX MH ти сте .
SFX MH ти ху .
SFX MH скакати ј .
SFX MH скакати јмо .
SFX MH скакати јте .
SFX MH скакати јучи .
SFX MH скакати јучего .
SFX MH скакати јучему .
SFX MH скакати јучим .
SFX MH скакати јучем .
SFX MH скакати јучих .
SFX MH скакати јучими .
SFX MH скакати јуча .
SFX MH скакати јучу .
SFX MH скакати јучеј .
SFX MH скакати јучеју .
SFX MH скакати јуче .
SFX MH скакати емы .
SFX MH скакати емого .
SFX MH скакати емому .
SFX MH скакати емым .
SFX MH скакати емом .
SFX MH скакати емо .
SFX MH скакати ема .
SFX MH скакати ему .
SFX MH скакати емој .
SFX MH скакати емоју .
SFX MH скакати еми .
SFX MH скакати еме .
SFX MH скакати емых .
SFX MH скакати емым .
SFX MH скакати емыми .
SFX MH ти вши .
SFX MH ти вшего .
SFX MH ти вшему .
SFX MH ти вшим .
SFX MH ти вшем .
SFX MH ти вших .
SFX MH ти вшими .
SFX MH ти вша .
SFX MH ти вшу .
SFX MH ти вшеј .
SFX MH ти вшеју .
SFX MH ти вше .
SFX MH ти ны .
SFX MH ти ного .
SFX MH ти ному .
SFX MH ти ным .
SFX MH ти ном .
SFX MH ти ни .
SFX MH ти не .
SFX MH ти ных .
SFX MH ти ными .
SFX MH ти на .
SFX MH ти ну .
SFX MH ти ној .
SFX MH ти ноју .
SFX MH ти но .
SFX MH ти нје/xPxE .
SFX MH ти нја/xPxE .
SFX MH ти нју/xPxE .
SFX MH ти нјем/xPxE .
SFX MH ти ниј/xPxE .
SFX MH ти нјам/xPxE .
SFX MH ти нјами/xPxE .
SFX MH ти нјах/xPxE .
